Maryland, session 2026, HB0229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–306.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, revenue bonds may be
issued by the Authority:
(1) Without obtaining the consent of any instrumentality, agency, or unit
of this State; and
(2) Without any proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things
other than those specifically required by this subtitle.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, revenue bonds
secured by toll revenue may be issued in any amount as long as the aggregate outstanding
and unpaid principal balance of the revenue bonds secured by toll revenue and revenue
bonds of prior issues does not exceed [$4,000,000,000] $5,000,000,000 on June 30 of any
year.
(ii) The maximum aggregate amount of revenue bonds that may be
outstanding and unpaid under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be reduced by the
amount of:
1. Any loan extended to the State under the federal
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act; and
– 1 –

Ch. 114 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. Any line of credit extended to the State under the federal
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act, to the extent the State draws
on the line of credit.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section and § 4–205 of this title,
without the approval of the General Assembly, the Authority may issue bonds to refinance
all or any part of the cost of a transportation facility project for which the Authority
previously issued bonds authorized under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –